Wyoming, session 2025, HB0317.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 31-18-603 is amended to read:

31-18-603. Loads on vehicles.

(a) No vehicle shall be driven or moved on any
highway unless the vehicle is so constructed or loaded as
to prevent any of its load from dropping, sifting, leaking
or otherwise escaping therefrom.

HB0317

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0770
(b) No vehicle with an open bed transporting dirt,
gravel, sand or rock shall be driven or moved on any
highway unless the open bed is securely covered with a
material that will prevent the load from dropping, sifting,
leaking or otherwise escaping therefrom.

(c) This section does not prohibit the necessary
spreading of any substance in highway maintenance or
construction operations.

Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0317